Louisiana, session 2026, SB521.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 6:356 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§356. Mergers and consolidation; use of previous name
In a merger or consolidation transaction, the surviving or new federally
insured state or national bank shall have the continuing right to use the name
of the nonsurviving state bank upon cessation of its corporate existence
following the effective date of the merger or consolidation transaction, as a
division of the surviving or new bank, under the following conditions and
circumstances:
(1) Disclosing, clearly and conspicuously, in signs, advertising, and
similar materials that the facility is a branch, division, or other unit of the
insured institution. The institution should exercise care that the signs and
advertising do not create a deceptive or misleading impression.
(2) Using the legal name of the insured institution for legal documents,
certificates of deposit, signature cards, loan agreements, account statements,
checks, drafts, and other similar documents.
(3) Educating the staff of the insured depository institution regarding the
possibility of customer confusion with respect to deposit insurance. The insured
depositary institution shall instruct staff at the branch and any other facilities
operating under trade names to inquire of customers, prior to opening new
accounts, whether the customer has deposits at the depository institution's other
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 521 ENROLLED
facilities or branches. During the time period soon after one institution acquires
or combines with another, staff shall be reminded to call customers' attention
to disclosures that identify a particular branch or facility as part of an
institution.
(4) Obtaining from depositors opening new accounts at the branch a
signed statement acknowledging that the depositor is aware that the branch and
other facilities are in fact parts of the same insured institution and that deposits
held at each facility are not separately insured.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.